Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 10
DERIVATIVE ACTIONS

7-62-1001. Right of action.

A limited partner may bring an action in the right of a limited partnership to recover a judgment in its favor. In order to bring the action, a limited partner must establish the following:

That those general partners with authority to do so have refused to bring the action or that an effort to cause those general partners to bring the action is not likely to succeed;

That the general partners' decision not to sue constitutes an abuse of discretion or involves a conflict of interest that prevents an unprejudiced exercise of judgment; and

That the plaintiff was a limited partner at the time of the transaction of which the plaintiff complains or the plaintiff's status as a limited partner had devolved upon the plaintiff by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the partnership agreement from a person who was a partner at the time of the transaction.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 450, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1447, § 148, effective July 1.

7-62-1002. Expenses.

In any action instituted in the right of any domestic or foreign limited partnership by a limited partner, the court having jurisdiction, upon final judgment and a finding that the action was brought without reasonable cause, may require the plaintiff to pay to the parties named as defendant the costs and reasonable expenses directly attributable to the defense of such action, but not including fees of attorneys.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 450, § 1, effective November 1.

7-62-1003. Security and costs.

In any action instituted in the right of any domestic or foreign limited partnership, unless the contributions of or allocable to plaintiff to partnership property amount to five percent or more of the contributions of all limited partners, in their status as limited partners, or such contributions of or allocable to the plaintiff have a market value in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars, the limited partnership in whose right such action is brought shall be entitled, at any time before final judgment, to require the plaintiff to give security for the costs and reasonable expenses that may be directly attributable to and incurred by it in the defense of such action or may be incurred by other parties named as defendant for which it may become legally liable, but not including fees of attorneys. Market value shall be determined as of the date that the plaintiff institutes the action or, in the case of an intervenor, as of the date that the intervenor becomes a party to the action. The amount of such security may from time to time be increased or decreased, in the discretion of the court, upon showing that the security provided has or may become inadequate or is excessive. The limited partnership shall have recourse to such security in such amount as the court having jurisdiction shall determine upon the termination of such action if the court finds the action was brought without reasonable cause.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 450, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1447, § 149, effective July 1.